District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1601

Distraint of goods and chattels authorized; levy and sale of land; advertisement of personal property sale; public auction; report and audit; disposition of surplus.

Repealed.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 621, ch. 1352, § 6, par. 12(a)
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 19(b), 34 DCR 850
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 44, 40 DCR 6311
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(v)(2), 48 DCR 334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1601.
1973 Ed., § 47-1301.

Editor's Notes

Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”